Washington statutes.
RCW 36.13.040

County census authorized—Information to be given enumerators.

All persons resident in the county, having knowledge of the facts, shall give the information required herein to any duly authorized census enumerator when requested by him or her.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4006; 1963 c 4 s 36.13.040. Prior: 1923 c 177 s 4; RRS s 4200-9.]